Hawaii statutes.
§667-76 Mortgagee's filing of notice with department; filing fee;
electronic public notice of public sale. (a) Within
three days after a mortgagee serves a foreclosure notice on an owner-occupant
pursuant to section 667-22, the mortgagee shall file the foreclosure notice
with the department and pay a filing fee of $250, which shall be deposited into
the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution special fund established under
section 667-86.

(b) A mortgagee who
elects to publish a public notice of public sale electronically pursuant to
section 667-27(d)(2)(A) shall publish the notice by filing the same with the
department and paying a filing fee of $300, which shall be deposited into the
mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution special fund established under section
667-86. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §1,
§45(2); am L 2012, c 182, §§40, 49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next